Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.715.070

Arts instruction.

RCW 28A.230.305, related to arts instruction, governs school operation and management under RCW 28A.715.020 and applies to state-tribal education compact schools with more than 200 enrolled students established under this chapter.

[ 2022 c 250 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—2022 c 250: See note following RCW 28A.230.020.